Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 2

Commissioners and Apportionment of Costs

54-12-201. Appointment of commissioners — Qualifications.

When the road improvement district has been located and established as provided for in part 1 of this chapter, the monthly county court shall appoint three (3) commissioners, one (1) of whom shall be a competent civil engineer and two (2) of whom shall be freeholders of the county not living within the road improvement district and not interested in the road improvement district, or in a like question, nor related to any party whose land is affected.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 44; Shan. Supp., § 1682a55; Code 1932, § 2869; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1401.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

Collateral References. Highways
90 et seq.

54-12-202. Oath of commissioners — Classification of lands on graduated scale of benefits.

The commissioners shall, as soon as practicable after their appointment, and after being duly sworn to perform their duties faithfully and impartially to the best of their abilities, inspect and classify all the lands benefited by the location and construction of the drainage or levee district in a graduated scale of benefits, naming the tract or tracts of each owner and so classifying the tract or tracts, each tract to be numbered according to the benefit received, as provided in §§ 54-12-204 and 54-12-205 by the proposed improvement.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 45; Shan. Supp., § 1682a56; Code 1932, § 2870; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1402.

54-12-203. Commissioners shall equitably apportion and assess costs — Report in writing.

The commissioners shall make an equitable apportionment and assessment of the costs, expenses, cost of construction, fees, and damages assessed for the construction of any improvement, and make a report in writing to the monthly county court.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 46; Shan. Supp., § 1682a57; Code 1932, § 2871; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1403.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-204. Classification according to percentage of benefits — Remains basis unless revised.

In making the estimate and apportionment pursuant to § 54-2-203 [repealed], the lands receiving the greatest benefit shall be marked on a scale of one hundred (100), and those benefited in a less degree shall be marked with a percentage of one hundred (100) as the benefit received bears in proportion to the lands receiving the greatest benefit.

This classification, when finally established, shall remain a basis for all future assessments connected with the objects of the road improvement district, unless the monthly county court, for good cause, shall authorize a revision of the classification.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 47; Shan. Supp., § 1682a58; Code 1932, § 2872; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1404.

Compiler's Notes. Section 54-2-203, referred to in subsection (a), was repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 203, § 1, effective April 23, 2013; and by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 24, effective July 1, 2013; and by Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 8, effective May 16, 2013.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

Collateral References.

Ad valorem tax for highway purposes without attempt to apportion on basis of benefits, validity of. 72 A.L.R. 1103.

Use of public improvement, assessment of property for, as affected by question of benefit to property. 127 A.L.R. 1374.

54-12-205. Subdivision and classification of body of land in one owner.

In making the classification, the commissioners are authorized to divide the land of one (1) owner lying in one (1) body into more than one (1) tract, and classify each subdivision of the tract, if they are of the opinion that portions of the entire tract will be more benefited than other portions, and especially when the entire tract is a large one, and that it will be more equitable and just to classify it in subdivisions.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 48; Shan. Supp., § 1682a59; Code 1932, § 2873; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1405.

54-12-206. Description and ownership of lands specified in reports.

In the report of the commissioners, they shall specify each tract of land by reasonable description and the ownership of the tract, as the tract appears on the tax books of the county or as the tract has been previously adjudged in the proceeding.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 49; Shan. Supp., § 1682a60; Code 1932, § 2874; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1406.

54-12-207. Objections to assessment and apportionment — Filing.

Any objections to the assessment and apportionment shall be filed in writing with the county clerk on or before twelve o'clock (12:00) noon of the day the matter of the assessment and apportionment is set for hearing by the monthly county court.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 49; Shan. Supp., § 1682a61; Code 1932, § 2875; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1407; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

Hearing, § 54-12-108.

54-12-208. Assessment made without notice.

The assessment may be made without notice, just as taxes are assessed without notice in such cases.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 49; Shan. Supp., § 1682a62; Code 1932, § 2876; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1408.

54-12-209. Publication of hearing assessments and apportionments.

Publication shall be made in three (3) weekly newspapers published in the county where the proceeding is pending, if there are that number published in the county, otherwise in at least one (1), for two (2) consecutive weeks, notifying all parties concerned in any way, of the date set for hearing the matter of assessment and apportionment by the court, when they can appear and be heard, if they desire; the last of the publications to be at least five (5) days before the day set for the hearing of the matter, and the publication to be in lieu of and instead of notice personally served, but shall not give the names of the parties, but only a brief statement of the date and purpose of the hearing.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 49; Shan. Supp., § 1682a63; Code 1932, § 2877; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1409.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

Publication, § 54-12-108.

Collateral References.

“Owner,” scope and import of term in statutes as to giving notice of making of local improvement. 2 A.L.R. 790, 95 A.L.R. 1085.

54-12-210. District in more than one county — Manner and times of publication.

If the district lies in more than one (1) county, the publication need only be made in one (1) weekly newspaper published in each of the counties having land embraced within the district; and, if there are daily newspapers published in any county, and no weekly newspaper, it shall be sufficient if such publication is made in a daily paper in such county, one (1) day in each week for the length of time required, instead of in a weekly newspaper.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 50; Shan. Supp., § 1682a64; Code 1932, § 2878; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1410.

54-12-211. Determination of all objections to report and questions of apportionment and assessments — Failure to benefit cannot be shown.

When the day set for hearing has arrived, and the hearing is not continued by the court for good reason, as it may be, and when the hearing is had, the monthly county court shall proceed to hear and determine all objections made and filed to the report, and may increase, diminish, annul, or affirm the apportionment and assessments made in the report, or in any parts of the report, as may appear to the court to be just and equitable; but in no case shall it be competent to show that the lands assessed would not be benefited by the improvement. When the hearing has been had, the court shall assess the apportionment fixed by it upon the lands within the road improvement district.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 51; Shan. Supp., § 1682a65; Code 1932, § 2879; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1411.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

Collateral References.

Ad valorem tax for highway purposes without attempt to apportion on basis of benefits, validity of. 72 A.L.R. 1103.

Use of public improvement, assessment of property for, as affected by question of benefit to property. 127 A.L.R. 1374.

54-12-212. Additional assessments, if first insufficient.

If the first assessment made by the monthly county court for the original cost of any improvement as provided in this part and part 1 of this chapter is insufficient, the court may make an additional assessment in the same ratio as the first.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 52; Shan. Supp., § 1682a66; Code 1932, § 2880; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1412.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-213. New report ordered and new commissioners when report annulled or set aside.

If for any reason the monthly county court annuls in toto or sets aside the report of the commissioners, it shall order them to make a new report, or shall remove them and appoint new commissioners to act as in the first instance, if desired by the parties concerned.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 53; Shan. Supp., § 1682a67; Code 1932, § 2881; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1413.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-214. Levy of assessments — Collected as other taxes — Paid out on county warrant.

The assessments shall be levied upon the lands of the owners so benefited in the ratio mentioned in § 54-12-204, and shall be collected in the same manner as taxes for county purposes, except as specifically provided in this part.

The funds collected shall be kept as a separate fund, and shall be paid out only for purposes properly connected with the improvement, and on the order or warrant of the county mayor.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 54; Shan. Supp., § 1682a68; Code 1932, § 2882; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1414; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; Acts 2003 ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

54-12-215. Special assessment to pay costs and expenses.

If, after the district has been created and the commissioners for the assessment of benefits have made their report, the report has been acted upon and confirmed by the monthly county court, the time for an appeal from the confirmation has elapsed and no appeal has been taken, and it appears to the court that the costs and expenses of the proceedings up to that state of the proceedings have not been otherwise paid, the court shall have the power to make a special assessment upon all the lands within the district, for an amount sufficient to pay the costs and expenses, including the expenses of collecting the special assessment.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 55; Shan. Supp., § 1682a69; Code 1932, § 2883; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1415.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-216. Special assessment, collection — Delinquencies — Compensation of trustee.

The assessment shall be made and collected in the same manner, and the delinquencies, if any, shall be collected and enforced in the same manner as provided in §§ 54-12-412 — 54-12-421, and by law.

The compensation of a trustee for collecting and paying over the assessment shall be the same as is provided by § 54-12-111; provided, that, for this special assessment, the monthly county court may fix the dates within which the assessment shall be collected, the court fixing the dates within dates the court deems reasonable for the collection of the assessments.

The assessments made for this purpose shall be a lien upon the respective tracts of land in the district upon which the assessment is made, but shall be inferior to the lien of any assessment that shall hereafter be made for the purpose of creating a fund for the payment of bonds and the interest on the bonds, as provided in this chapter, and by law.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 56; Shan. Supp., § 1682a70; Code 1932, § 2884; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1416.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

Collateral References.

Prohibition to prevent collection of assessments. 115 A.L.R. 20, 159 A.L.R. 627.

Public property, manner of enforcing special assessments against. 95 A.L.R. 689, 150 A.L.R. 1394.

Right of one governmental unit, or officer thereof, to compensation for collecting or disbursing special assessments levied by or owed to another governmental unit. 114 A.L.R. 1098.

54-12-217. Fund for payment of costs and expenses.

When the assessment is collected, it shall constitute a fund for the payment of the costs and expenses.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 57; Shan. Supp., § 1682a71; Code 1932, § 2885; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1417.

54-12-218. Trustee to pay collections over to county clerk who shall pay to parties entitled under orders of court.

The trustee shall pay the amount collected to the county clerk, upon the order or warrant of the county mayor; and when the amount collected has been paid to the clerk, the clerk will pay out the amount collected to the parties entitled under the order of the monthly county court.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 58; Shan. Supp., § 1682a72; Code 1932, § 2886; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1418; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 22, 36; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-219. Bonds required of trustee and county clerk.

The trustee, before receiving the assessment book and proceeding to the collection of the assessments, and the county clerk, before receiving the funds from the trustee, shall, respectively, enter into a bond for double the amount that will come into their hands, respectively, payable to the state, and conditioned on the faithful paying over and accounting for the funds arising from the assessment.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 59; Shan. Supp., § 1682a73; Code 1932, § 2887; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1419; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36.

54-12-220. Appeal from order fixing assessment of benefits within five days — Other provisions applicable.

An appeal may be taken within five (5) days to the circuit court of the county from the order of the monthly county court fixing the assessment of benefits upon the lands in the same manner and time as provided in §§ 54-12-141 — 54-12-149 for appeals from the assessment of damages, including the provisions as to consolidating cases, making transcript, etc., and certifying to the monthly county court the action and doings of the circuit court.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 60; Shan. Supp., § 1682a74; Code 1932, § 2888; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1420.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

Collateral References.

Appeal, who is “adverse party” entitled to notice of. 88 A.L.R. 439.

54-12-221. Appellant from order fixing assessment of benefits shall give appeal bond, and not pauper's oath.

Any landowner, tenant, or encumbrancer who appeals from the order fixing the assessment of benefits shall execute bond, with security, for cost and damages.

The oath provided by law for poor persons shall not be allowed in lieu of the bonds.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 61; Shan. Supp., § 1682a75; Code 1932, § 2889; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1421.

54-12-222. Appeal does not prevent collection of assessments, if appellant is indemnified by bond.

The appeal shall not prevent the collection of the assessments, nor stay the collection in any way, if the district or any petitioner for the district executes a bond, with good security, payable to the appellant, and conditioned to hold the appellant harmless against loss and to abide by and perform the judgment of the court, if the appeal is successfully prosecuted.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 62; Shan. Supp., § 1682a76; Code 1932, § 2890; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1422.

54-12-223. Indemnity bond — Execution.

The bond, if given by the district, may be executed before and accepted by the county clerk at any time after appeal is perfected by the landowner, tenant, or encumbrancer, and a certified copy of the bond shall be sent to the circuit court.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 63; Shan. Supp., § 1682a77; Code 1932, § 2891; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1423; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36.

54-12-224. Counsel employed for district on trial in appellate court — Payment.

When an appeal is taken from any order of the monthly county court made in any proceedings before it under this chapter, the court may employ counsel to represent the interests of the road improvement district affected by appeal, on the trial of the order in the appellate courts, and the expenses of counsel shall be paid out of the fund of the district.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 64; Shan. Supp., § 1682a78; Code 1932, § 2892; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1424; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.

54-12-225. If any assessment cannot be enforced, assessments and apportionments shall be made as if never made — Lands not assessed will be assessed — Validity not affected.

Where any assessments made and levied under this part or part 1 of this chapter cannot for any reason be enforced, and part of the work has been done, the monthly county court shall proceed as to any or all lands benefited by the improvement in the same manner as if the appraisement and apportionment of benefits had never been made, in which event any payment already made shall be duly credited to those who have paid the assessments.

After a district is ordered established, if it is found that any parcel of land within its limits has been overlooked, or is not reported for assessment, or if it is found that any owner or encumbrancer of any land has not been properly brought before the court, the mistake or order may be corrected, and the court shall cause the parcel of land to be listed for assessment and cause the owner or encumbrancer, if any, to be properly brought before the court, and as to the lands or parties, the matter shall be proceeded with as if proceeded in the beginning, so as to enforce proper and proportional assessments. As to all other parties already before the court, the validity of the proceedings shall not be affected because some of the lands have been overlooked and some of the owners or encumbrancers of the lands were not brought before the court before the district was ordered established.

Acts 1919, ch. 193, § 67; Shan. Supp., § 1682a81; Code 1932, § 2895; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1425.

Cross-References. Authority of the monthly county court, title 5.

Body exercising jurisdiction of former monthly county court, § 54-12-102.